Hawaii statutes.
§662-5 Jury. Any action against the
State under this chapter shall be tried by the court without a jury; provided
that the court, with the consent of all the parties, may order a trial with a
jury whose verdict shall have the same effect as if trial by jury had been a
matter of right. [L 1957, c 312, pt of §1; Supp, §245A-5; HRS §662-5; am L
1979, c 152, §2]

Case Notes

This section held not to entitle county of Hawaii to nonjury
trial. 57 H. 656, 562 P.2d 436 (1977).

Consent to trial cannot be involuntary or implied. 6 H. App.
582, 733 P.2d 1224 (1987).

Read together, this section acts as a limitation on the
general state tort liability waiver found in §662-2, and the general waiver
thus does not provide a right to a jury trial for tort actions against state
entities; therefore, the circuit court did not err in independently determining
the state hospital's liability, resulting in joint and several damages
different from those "awarded" by the jury. 127 H. 325 (App.), 278
P.3d 382 (2012).

Read together with this section, §663-10.9(3) requires the
imposition of joint and several liability only as adjudicated by the court, not
the jury; having determined that the state hospital's individual degree of
negligence was more than twenty-five per cent, the circuit court properly
awarded joint and several damages against the hospital to the full extent that
the court determined patient's injuries to arise out of the subject incident,
and therefore complied with §663-10.9(3). 127 H. 325 (App.), 278 P.3d 382
(2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next